Washington statutes.
RCW 4.72.030

Petition to vacate for certain causes—Time limitation.

RCW 4.72.010 (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), and (7) shall be by petition verified by affidavit, setting forth the judgment or order, the facts or errors constituting a cause to vacate or modify it, and if the party is a defendant, the facts constituting a defense to the action; and such proceedings must be commenced within one year after the judgment or order was made, unless the party entitled thereto be a minor or person of unsound mind, and then within one year from the removal of such disability.

[ 1891 c 27 s 2; Code 1881 s 439; 1877 p 97 s 441; 1875 p 21 s 4; RRS s 467.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 60(b).